Hawaii, session 2025, SB652.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that tire dumping in the State creates serious health and environmental concerns.  The abandonment of motor vehicle tires on private and public properties is prohibited, yet tires are still often illegally dumped. The purpose of this Act is to discourage tire dumping in Hawaii by tracking motor vehicle tires and holding people who dump tires liable. SECTION 2. Chapter 342I, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§342I- Tire inventory database.  (a)  For each motor vehicle tire sold by a tire retailer, the tire retailer shall collect and submit to the department of health the following information: (1)  The purchaser's name; (2)  The model and serial number of each motor vehicle tire sold; and (3)  The date of sale. (b)  The department of health shall establish and maintain a database containing the information reported pursuant to subsection (a).  Each record shall be kept in the database for at least    years. (c)  Any tire retailer violating the requirements of subsection (a) shall be fined for each offense." SECTION 3.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________